Louisiana, session 2026, HB1236.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1868(B)(introductory paragraph), (1), and (4) and (C)(1), (2), and
(3)(c) and (d) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 22:1868(B)(5), (D), and (E) are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1868. Local pharmacy reimbursement; National Average Drug Acquisition Costs;
appeals
* * *
B. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1)(a) "Acquisition cost" means the set of National Average Drug
Acquisition Costs, "NADAC", as calculated by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services and reflected in the most recently released public file. means the
amount a local pharmacy actually pays to purchase a prescription drug or device, as
evidenced by a wholesaler or manufacturer invoice, and shall not be less than the
National Average Drug Acquisition Cost or NADAC published by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services on the date the prescription drug is dispensed.
(b) For drugs for which no NADAC rate is published, acquisition cost means
the local pharmacy's documented invoice cost or, if no invoice is available, the
wholesale acquisition cost as published in a nationally recognized drug pricing
compendium on the date of dispensing.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1236 ENROLLED
(c) "Acquisition cost" is not defined by or determined at the sole discretion
of a pharmacy benefit manager or third-party administrator.
* * *
(4) "Reimbursement formula" means a prescription drug reimbursement
calculation involving an ingredient price, calculated based on a prescription drug
pricing benchmark plus an adjustment factor, and a professional dispensing fee.
(5) "Professional dispensing fee" means a fee that meets all of the following:
(a) Incurred at the point of sale or service and pays for costs in excess of the
ingredient cost of a covered outpatient drug each time a covered outpatient drug is
dispensed.
(b) Includes only pharmacy costs associated with ensuring that possession
of the appropriate covered outpatient drug is transferred to a beneficiary. Pharmacy
costs include but are not limited to reasonable costs associated with a pharmacist's
time in checking the computer for information about an individual's coverage,
performing drug utilization review and preferred drug list review activities,
measurement or mixing of the covered outpatient drug, filling the container,
beneficiary counseling, and physically providing the completed prescription to the
beneficiary, delivery, special packaging, and overhead associated with maintaining
the facility and equipment necessary to operate the pharmacy.
(c) Does not include administrative costs incurred by the state in the
operation of the covered outpatient drug benefit including systems costs for
interfacing with pharmacies.
C. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, effective January
1, 2026, a pharmacy benefit manager shall meet all of the following requirements for
claims submitted by any local pharmacy to a pharmacy benefit manager
administering claims on behalf of a health plan, except for the Office of Group
Benefits:
(1) Adopt a reimbursement formula using either NADAC as the prescription
drug pricing benchmark or, if NADAC is not available, the wholesale acquisition
cost. or, with prior written approval by the commissioner, an alternative prescription
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1236 ENROLLED
drug pricing benchmark that results in claim payment errors that are both comparable
to or less than NADAC in terms of frequency and smaller than NADAC in terms of
magnitude.
(2)(a) Adopt a reimbursement formula using an adjustment factor that, based
on claims experience data available to the pharmacy benefit manager, is reasonably
expected to result in a claim payment error rate of no more than two percent per drug
as identified by its national drug code. a professional dispensing fee that is an
amount not less than the professional dispensing fee established by the Louisiana
Department of Health for the Louisiana Medicaid program.
(b) The professional dispensing fee shall reflect the actual costs of the
professional services provided by the pharmacists and expenses related to the
physical act of dispensing.
(3) Adopt an appeal process for pharmacists to challenge claim payment
errors that, at a minimum, meets all of the following requirements:
* * *
(c) If an appeal is filed with the pharmacy benefit manager, the pharmacy
must shall include a written invoice from the wholesaler that includes the drug name,
national drug code number, purchase date, and cost of the drug.
(d) If a claim payment error occurred, the pharmacy benefit manager shall
make an additional payment to the pharmacy to increase the reimbursement amount
to the acquisition cost. The pharmacy benefit manager is prohibited from amending
or changing the amount a prescription drug consumer must pay for an out-of-pocket
cost share or expense.
* * *
D. The reimbursement formula adopted by a pharmacy benefit manager
pursuant to this Section shall include the professional dispensing fee required by this
Section as a non-recoverable cost. The pharmacy benefit manager shall not collect,
recoup, or recover the professional dispensing fee from any pharmacy, pharmacist,
or member.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1236 ENROLLED
E. The commissioner may require submission of claims-level data, including
but not limited to reimbursement amounts, dispensing fees, and any adjustments for
the purpose of verifying compliance with this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 22:1868(B)(2) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall be given prospective and retroactive
application. The provisions of Subsection D shall be applied retroactively to January 1, 2026.
A pharmacy benefit manager shall be deemed compliant with this retroactive application
upon demonstration that it has adopted and reprocessed all applicable claims retroactively
to January 1, 2026, using a reimbursement formula which includes the prescription drug
pricing benchmark described in R.S. 22:1868(C)(1) as amended herein plus a professional
dispensing fee that is an amount no less than nine dollars. The reimbursement formula shall
also apply prospectively and the deemed compliance applicable to the retroactive application
shall not be construed to apply to the prospective application of this Act. All other
provisions of this Act shall apply prospectively only.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.